Tennessee, session 114, HB0094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-21-221, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection (c):
(c) This state shall pay for the examination required under subsection (a) and, if
necessary, any transportation costs associated with the examination.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0094
000155
- 1 -